Hawaii statutes.
§662-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter the term:

"Acting within the scope of the employee's
office or employment", in the case of a member of the Hawaii National
Guard or Hawaii state defense force, means acting in the line of duty.

"Employees of the State" includes
officers and employees of any state agency, members of the Hawaii national
guard, Hawaii state defense force, and persons acting in behalf of a state
agency in an official capacity, temporarily, whether with or without compensation.
"Employees of the State" also includes persons employed by a county
of this State as lifeguards and designated to provide lifeguard services at a
designated state beach park under an agreement between the State and that
county.

"State agency" includes the executive
departments, boards, and commissions of the State but does not include any
contractor with the State. [L 1957, c 312, pt of §1; Supp, §245A-1; HRS §662-1;
am L 1988, c 135, §1; am L 1991, c 316, §1; am L 2015, c 35, §19]

Law Journals and Reviews

Rogers v. State: The Limits of State Tort Liability. 8 HBJ no.
3, at 89 (1971).

Case Notes

Federal employee acting in line of duty may also be acting in
line of duty under state tort liability law. 643 F. Supp. 593 (1986).

Act should be liberally construed to effectuate its purpose.
51 H. 293, 459 P.2d 378 (1969).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next